Tennessee, session 114, HB0560.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-4-1704(d), is amended by
inserting the language ", and the list is subject to such restrictions on use as determined by the
commissioner" immediately after the language "extended period".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0560
002005
- 1 -